Utah statutes.
57-19-15.   Application for registration of salesperson.
(1)  A person may apply for registration as a salesperson under this chapter
by filing with the director an application in the form prescribed by the
director, including:
(a)  a statement of whether or not the applicant has ever been:
(i)  convicted of:
(A)  a felony; or
(B)  a misdemeanor involving theft, fraud, or dishonesty; or
(ii)  enjoined from, assessed a civil penalty for, or found to have engaged in
the violation of a law designed to protect a consumer;
(b) (i)  a statement describing the applicant's employment history for the
five years immediately preceding the day on which the application is filed;
and
(ii)  a statement of whether or not a termination of employment during the
period described in Subsection (1)(b)(i) is as a result of theft, fraud, or an
act of dishonesty; and
(c)  any other information that the director, by rule, considers necessary to
protect the interests of a purchaser.
(2)  Notwithstanding the requirements for a regulatory fee under Section
63J-1-504, at the time an applicant files an application, the applicant shall
pay to the division a fee of $100.
(3) (a)  Registration as a salesperson is effective for a period for two
years, unless the director specifies otherwise.
(b)  To renew a registration a salesperson shall:
(i)  file a form prescribed by the director for that purpose; and
(ii)  pay a renewal fee of $100.
